District of Columbia statutes.
29-921

Referendum on acts of directors.

The articles or bylaws may provide that, within a specified period of time, any action taken by the directors shall be referred to the members for approval or disapproval if demanded by petition of at least 10% of all the members or by vote of at least a majority of the directors; provided, that the rights of third parties which have vested between the time of such action and such referendum shall not be impaired thereby.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-921.
1981 Ed., § 29-1121.
1973 Ed., § 29-821.